Washington statutes.
RCW 18.140.080

Education requirements.

As a prerequisite to taking an examination for certification or licensure, an applicant shall present evidence satisfactory to the director that he or she has successfully completed the education requirements adopted by the director.

[ 1993 c 30 s 8; 1989 c 414 s 12.]